Utah statutes.
16-10a-301.   Purposes.

(1)  Every corporation incorporated under this chapter and including in its articles of incorporation a statement meeting the requirements of Subsection 16-10a-202(3) may engage in any lawful business except for express limitations set forth in the articles of incorporation.

(2)  A corporation engaging in a business that is subject to regulation under another statute of this state may incorporate under this chapter only if permitted by, and subject to all limitations of, the other statute.

